Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 14 Family Planning and Birth Control [Repealed]

§§ 35-14-101 through 35-14-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed and recreated as §§

42-5-101

and

42-5-102

by Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2, repealed and recreated former §§

35-14-101

through 35-14-106 as present §§

42-5-101

through

42-5-102

, effective July 1, 1988. See title 42 and notes thereto.